Hawaii statutes.
§454F-2 Exemptions. This chapter shall
not apply to the following:

(1) An exempt registered mortgage loan originator
when acting for an insured depository institution or an institution regulated
by the Farm Credit Administration, except as otherwise provided by this
chapter;

(2) A licensed attorney who negotiates the terms of a
residential mortgage loan on behalf of a client as an ancillary matter to the
attorney's representation of the client unless the attorney is compensated by a
lender, a mortgage loan originator company, or other mortgage loan originator
or by an agent of a lender, mortgage loan originator company, or other mortgage
loan originator;

(3) A person or entity that only performs real estate
brokerage activities and is licensed or registered by the State unless the
person or entity is compensated by a lender, a mortgage loan originator
company, or other mortgage loan originator or by an agent of the lender,
mortgage loan originator company, or other mortgage loan originator;

(4) A person or entity solely involved in extensions
of credit relating to timeshare plans, as the term is defined in title 11
United States Code section 101(53D);

(5) An exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator
company as defined by this chapter except as otherwise provided by this
chapter;

(6) An insured depository institution;

(7) An institution regulated by the Farm Credit
Administration;

(8) Employees of government agencies or of housing
finance agencies who act as mortgage loan originators; or

(9) A seller
of real property who offers or negotiates terms of a residential mortgage loan
that is financed by the seller and secured by the seller's own real property;
provided that:

(A) The seller is a person, estate, or trust
that transacts three or fewer residential mortgage loans in one calendar year;

(B) The seller is not a loan originator for
purposes of the loan originator qualification requirements in 12 C.F.R. section
1026.36(f) and (g);

(C) The seller has not constructed or acted
as the construction contractor for the residence on the property in the
ordinary course of the seller's business;

(D) The interest rate for the loan does not
exceed the State's usury limit; provided that the exemptions from usury
specified in section 478-8 shall not apply to transactions subject to this
paragraph;

(E) The seller shall provide to the buyer the
terms of the financing including:

(i) A current title search including any liens
against the property;

(ii) The interest rate;

(iii) Monthly
principal and interest payments;

(iv) Any prepayment penalty;

(v) Any late payment charges;

(vi) The
payment schedule;

(vii) The total amount of interest that the
mortgagor will pay over the term of the loan expressed as a percentage of the
loan amount;

(viii) A calculation of projected aggregate
monthly payments including principal and interest;

(ix) Estimated closing costs if closing costs
are included in loan costs and estimated cash to close if closing costs are not
included in loan costs. For purposes of this paragraph, closing costs shall
include recording fees, transfer taxes, prepaid costs such as homeowner's
insurance premiums or property taxes, and appraisal costs charged to the
mortgagor;

(x) The
seller's contact information including name, address, phone number, electronic
mail address, and alternate contact information to the extent available; and

(xi) A statement that the seller will acquire a
security interest in the buyer's dwelling and that the buyer may lose the
dwelling in the event of a loan default;

(F) The seller shall provide a disclaimer, to
be initialed by the buyer, which states, "BUYER ACKNOWLEDGES RECEIVING
FINANCING FROM THE SELLER IN THIS TRANSACTION AND GRANTING THE SELLER A
MORTGAGE. THIS CAN HAVE SERIOUS CONSEQUENCES SHOULD BUYER FAIL TO MAKE ANY
PAYMENTS INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO FORECLOSURE AND THE LOSS OF BUYER'S
PROPERTY. THEREFORE, IT IS IMPORTANT THAT BUYER UNDERSTANDS ALL FINANCING
TERMS AND OBLIGATIONS AND OBTAINS PROFESSIONAL EXPERT ADVICE TO THE EXTENT NECESSARY
TO ENSURE BUYER IS FULLY ADVISED IN THIS MATTER."; and

(G) A residential
mortgage loan shall be recorded with the land court or bureau of conveyances as
applicable. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §9; am L 2011, c 194,
§4; am L 2012, c 252, §7; am L 2014, c 198, §2; am L 2015, c 225, §2; am L
2016, c 122, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next